language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0690 Y 55
SFX 0690 ska skach ...
SFX 0690 ska skachmoj ...
SFX 0690 ska skachmy ...
SFX 0690 ska skachu ...
SFX 0690 ska skaj ...
SFX 0690 ska skajmoj ...
SFX 0690 ska skajmy ...
SFX 0690 ska skajtaj ...
SFX 0690 ska skajtej ...
SFX 0690 ska skajće ...
SFX 0690 ska skali ...
SFX 0690 ska skana ...
SFX 0690 ska skanaj ...
SFX 0690 ska skane ...
SFX 0690 ska skaneho ...
SFX 0690 ska skanej ...
SFX 0690 ska skaneje ...
SFX 0690 ska skaneju ...
SFX 0690 ska skanemu ...
SFX 0690 ska skani ...
SFX 0690 ska skanja ...
SFX 0690 ska skanjach ...
SFX 0690 ska skanjam ...
SFX 0690 ska skanje ...
SFX 0690 ska skanjemi ...
SFX 0690 ska skanjom ...
SFX 0690 ska skanjomaj ...
SFX 0690 ska skanjow ...
SFX 0690 ska skanju ...
SFX 0690 ska skanoh ...
SFX 0690 ska skanom ...
SFX 0690 ska skanu ...
SFX 0690 ska skany ...
SFX 0690 ska skanych ...
SFX 0690 ska skanym ...
SFX 0690 ska skanymaj ...
SFX 0690 ska skanymi ...
SFX 0690 ska skawši ...
SFX 0690 ska skać ...
SFX 0690 ska skał ...
SFX 0690 ska skała ...
SFX 0690 ska skałe ...
SFX 0690 ska skało ...
SFX 0690 ska skałoj ...
SFX 0690 ska skaštaj ...
SFX 0690 ska skaštej ...
SFX 0690 ska skašće ...
SFX 0690 ska šće ...
SFX 0690 ska šćemoj ...
SFX 0690 ska šćemy ...
SFX 0690 ska šćetaj ...
SFX 0690 ska šćetej ...
SFX 0690 ska šćeće ...
SFX 0690 ska šćeš ...
SFX 0690 ska šću ...

SFX 0691 Y 15
SFX 0691 šo žniša ..
SFX 0691 šo žniše ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišeho ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišej ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišeje ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišeju ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišemu ..
SFX 0691 šo žniši ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišich ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišim ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišimaj ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišimi ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišoh ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišom ..
SFX 0691 šo žnišu ..

SFX 0692 Y 17
SFX 0692 he žna ..
SFX 0692 he žnaj ..
SFX 0692 he žne ..
SFX 0692 he žneho ..
SFX 0692 he žnej ..
SFX 0692 he žneje ..
SFX 0692 he žneju ..
SFX 0692 he žnemu ..
SFX 0692 he žni ..
SFX 0692 he žnoh ..
SFX 0692 he žnom ..
SFX 0692 he žnu ..
SFX 0692 he žny ..
SFX 0692 he žnych ..
SFX 0692 he žnym ..
SFX 0692 he žnymaj ..
SFX 0692 he žnymi ..

SFX 0693 Y 34
SFX 0693 he šo ..
SFX 0693 he žna ..
SFX 0693 he žnaj ..
SFX 0693 he žne ..
SFX 0693 he žneho ..
SFX 0693 he žnej ..
SFX 0693 he žneje ..
SFX 0693 he žneju ..
SFX 0693 he žnemu ..
SFX 0693 he žni ..
SFX 0693 he žniša ..
SFX 0693 he žniše ..
SFX 0693 he žnišeho ..
SFX 0693 he žnišej ..
SFX 0693 he žnišeje ..
SFX 0693 he žnišeju ..
SFX 0693 he žnišemu ..
SFX 0693 he žniši ..
SFX 0693 he žnišich ..
SFX 0693 he žnišim ..
SFX 0693 he žnišimaj ..
SFX 0693 he žnišimi ..
SFX 0693 he žnišoh ..
SFX 0693 he žnišom ..
SFX 0693 he žnišu ..
SFX 0693 he žno ..
SFX 0693 he žnoh ..
SFX 0693 he žnom ..
SFX 0693 he žnu ..
SFX 0693 he žny ..
SFX 0693 he žnych ..
SFX 0693 he žnym ..
SFX 0693 he žnymaj ..
SFX 0693 he žnymi ..

SFX 0694 Y 53
SFX 0694 0 ch .
SFX 0694 0 chmoj .
SFX 0694 0 chmy .
SFX 0694 0 chu .
SFX 0694 0 dźa .
SFX 0694 0 j .
SFX 0694 0 jmoj .
SFX 0694 0 jmy .
SFX 0694 0 jo .
SFX 0694 0 jtaj .
SFX 0694 0 jtej .
SFX 0694 0 jće .
SFX 0694 0 li .
SFX 0694 0 m .
SFX 0694 0 moj .
SFX 0694 0 my .
SFX 0694 0 ta .
SFX 0694 0 taj .
SFX 0694 0 te .
SFX 0694 0 teho .
SFX 0694 0 tej .
SFX 0694 0 teje .
SFX 0694 0 teju .
SFX 0694 0 temu .
SFX 0694 0 toh .
SFX 0694 0 tom .
SFX 0694 0 tu .
SFX 0694 0 ty .
SFX 0694 0 tych .
SFX 0694 0 tym .
SFX 0694 0 tymaj .
SFX 0694 0 tymi .
SFX 0694 0 ć .
SFX 0694 0 ća .
SFX 0694 0 ćach .
SFX 0694 0 ćam .
SFX 0694 0 će .
SFX 0694 0 ćemi .
SFX 0694 0 ći .
SFX 0694 0 ćom .
SFX 0694 0 ćomaj .
SFX 0694 0 ćow .
SFX 0694 0 ću .
SFX 0694 0 ł .
SFX 0694 0 ła .
SFX 0694 0 łe .
SFX 0694 0 ło .
SFX 0694 0 łoj .
SFX 0694 0 š .
SFX 0694 0 še .
SFX 0694 0 štaj .
SFX 0694 0 štej .
SFX 0694 0 šće .

SFX 0695 Y 56
SFX 0695 e edźa .
SFX 0695 e emoj .
SFX 0695 e emy .
SFX 0695 e etaj .
SFX 0695 e etej .
SFX 0695 e eće .
SFX 0695 e eš .
SFX 0695 e u .
SFX 0695 e y .
SFX 0695 e ych .
SFX 0695 e ychmoj .
SFX 0695 e ychmy .
SFX 0695 e ychu .
SFX 0695 e yj .
SFX 0695 e yjmoj .
SFX 0695 e yjmy .
SFX 0695 e yjtaj .
SFX 0695 e yjtej .
SFX 0695 e yjće .
SFX 0695 e yli .
SFX 0695 e yta .
SFX 0695 e ytaj .
SFX 0695 e yte .
SFX 0695 e yteho .
SFX 0695 e ytej .
SFX 0695 e yteje .
SFX 0695 e yteju .
SFX 0695 e ytemu .
SFX 0695 e ytoh .
SFX 0695 e ytom .
SFX 0695 e ytu .
SFX 0695 e yty .
SFX 0695 e ytych .
SFX 0695 e ytym .
SFX 0695 e ytymaj .
SFX 0695 e ytymi .
SFX 0695 e ywši .
SFX 0695 e yć .
SFX 0695 e yća .
SFX 0695 e yćach .
SFX 0695 e yćam .
SFX 0695 e yće .
SFX 0695 e yćemi .
SFX 0695 e yći .
SFX 0695 e yćom .
SFX 0695 e yćomaj .
SFX 0695 e yćow .
SFX 0695 e yću .
SFX 0695 e ył .
SFX 0695 e yła .
SFX 0695 e yłe .
SFX 0695 e yło .
SFX 0695 e yłoj .
SFX 0695 e yštaj .
SFX 0695 e yštej .
SFX 0695 e yšće .

SFX 0696 Y 75
SFX 0696 a aca .
SFX 0696 a acaj .
SFX 0696 a ace .
SFX 0696 a aceho .
SFX 0696 a acej .
SFX 0696 a aceje .
SFX 0696 a aceju .
SFX 0696 a acemu .
SFX 0696 a ach .
SFX 0696 a achmoj .
SFX 0696 a achmy .
SFX 0696 a achu .
SFX 0696 a acoh .
SFX 0696 a acom .
SFX 0696 a acu .
SFX 0696 a acy .
SFX 0696 a acych .
SFX 0696 a acym .
SFX 0696 a acymaj .
SFX 0696 a acymi .
SFX 0696 a am .
SFX 0696 a amoj .
SFX 0696 a amy .
SFX 0696 a ana .
SFX 0696 a anaj .
SFX 0696 a ane .
SFX 0696 a aneho .
SFX 0696 a anej .
SFX 0696 a aneje .
SFX 0696 a aneju .
SFX 0696 a anemu .
SFX 0696 a ani .
SFX 0696 a anoh .
SFX 0696 a anom .
SFX 0696 a anu .
SFX 0696 a any .
SFX 0696 a anych .
SFX 0696 a anym .
SFX 0696 a anymaj .
SFX 0696 a anymi .
SFX 0696 a ataj .
SFX 0696 a atej .
SFX 0696 a awši .
SFX 0696 a ał .
SFX 0696 a ała .
SFX 0696 a ałe .
SFX 0696 a ało .
SFX 0696 a ałoj .
SFX 0696 a ej .
SFX 0696 a eja .
SFX 0696 a ejmoj .
SFX 0696 a ejmy .
SFX 0696 a ejo .
SFX 0696 a ejtaj .
SFX 0696 a ejtej .
SFX 0696 a eju .
SFX 0696 a ejće .
SFX 0696 a eli .
SFX 0696 a eni .
SFX 0696 a enja .
SFX 0696 a enjach .
SFX 0696 a enjam .
SFX 0696 a enje .
SFX 0696 a enjemi .
SFX 0696 a enjom .
SFX 0696 a enjomaj .
SFX 0696 a enjow .
SFX 0696 a enju .
SFX 0696 a eć .
SFX 0696 a eće .
SFX 0696 a eš .
SFX 0696 a eše .
SFX 0696 a eštaj .
SFX 0696 a eštej .
SFX 0696 a ešće .

SFX 0697 Y 56
SFX 0697 0 i .
SFX 0697 0 imoj .
SFX 0697 0 imy .
SFX 0697 0 itaj .
SFX 0697 0 itej .
SFX 0697 0 iće .
SFX 0697 0 iš .
SFX 0697 0 ja .
SFX 0697 0 jach .
SFX 0697 0 jachmoj .
SFX 0697 0 jachmy .
SFX 0697 0 jachu .
SFX 0697 0 jana .
SFX 0697 0 janaj .
SFX 0697 0 jane .
SFX 0697 0 janeho .
SFX 0697 0 janej .
SFX 0697 0 janeje .
SFX 0697 0 janeju .
SFX 0697 0 janemu .
SFX 0697 0 jani .
SFX 0697 0 janoh .
SFX 0697 0 janom .
SFX 0697 0 janu .
SFX 0697 0 jany .
SFX 0697 0 janych .
SFX 0697 0 janym .
SFX 0697 0 janymaj .
SFX 0697 0 janymi .
SFX 0697 0 jawši .
SFX 0697 0 jał .
SFX 0697 0 jała .
SFX 0697 0 jałe .
SFX 0697 0 jało .
SFX 0697 0 jałoj .
SFX 0697 0 jeli .
SFX 0697 0 jeni .
SFX 0697 0 jenja .
SFX 0697 0 jenjach .
SFX 0697 0 jenjam .
SFX 0697 0 jenje .
SFX 0697 0 jenjemi .
SFX 0697 0 jenjom .
SFX 0697 0 jenjomaj .
SFX 0697 0 jenjow .
SFX 0697 0 jenju .
SFX 0697 0 jeć .
SFX 0697 0 ještaj .
SFX 0697 0 ještej .
SFX 0697 0 ješće .
SFX 0697 0 ju .
SFX 0697 0 moj .
SFX 0697 0 my .
SFX 0697 0 taj .
SFX 0697 0 tej .
SFX 0697 0 će .

SFX 0698 Y 18
SFX 0698 li lě ..
SFX 0698 li ła ..
SFX 0698 li łaj ..
SFX 0698 li łe ..
SFX 0698 li łeho ..
SFX 0698 li łej ..
SFX 0698 li łeje ..
SFX 0698 li łeju ..
SFX 0698 li łemu ..
SFX 0698 li ło ..
SFX 0698 li łoh ..
SFX 0698 li łom ..
SFX 0698 li łu ..
SFX 0698 li ły ..
SFX 0698 li łych ..
SFX 0698 li łym ..
SFX 0698 li łymaj ..
SFX 0698 li łymi ..

SFX 0699 Y 16
SFX 0699 na dyn ..
SFX 0699 na naj ..
SFX 0699 na ne ..
SFX 0699 na nej ..
SFX 0699 na neje ..
SFX 0699 na neju ..
SFX 0699 na ni ..
SFX 0699 na noh ..
SFX 0699 na noho ..
SFX 0699 na nom ..
SFX 0699 na nomu ..
SFX 0699 na nu ..
SFX 0699 na nych ..
SFX 0699 na nym ..
SFX 0699 na nymaj ..
SFX 0699 na nymi ..
