language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.dic
najzašo/0691
nanajzašo/0691
njezachce/0695
njezastyska/0690
njezda/0694
njezechce/0695
njezestaja/0696
njezešědźiw/0697
přezahe/0692
přezli/0698
zachce/0695
zahe/0693
zastyska/0690
zda/0694
zechce/0695
zestaja/0696
zešědźiw/0697
žana/0699
